District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

34-1225

Insurance; performance bond; indemnification of District.

Repealed.

Aug. 21, 1982, D.C. Law 4-142, § 26, 29 DCR 2872
Oct. 22, 1983, D.C. Law 5-36, § 2(aa), 30 DCR 4289
Oct. 9, 2002, D.C. Law 14-193, § 3, 49 DCR 7334
1981 Ed., § 43-1825.
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 3 of Cable Television Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-409, July 15, 2002, 49 DCR 7280).